New Jersey, session 221, S3327.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  In anticipation of the 2026 FIFA World Cup, which is scheduled, in part, to take place in New Jersey, the Commission on Human Trafficking, established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2013, c.51 (C.52:17B-237), shall hold one or more meetings of the commission, the date for which to be determined by the chair of the commission.  The commission meetings and duties required pursuant to this section shall be in addition to the duties required of the commission under current law. In order to identify the increased risk of human trafficking crimes, and actions that may be taken by the State prior to and during the 2026 FIFA World Cup to reduce these risks, the commission shall meet and develop a report pursuant to this section.  The Commission may coordinate with non-profit organizations to develop the report. b.    It shall be the duty of the commission to: (1)   evaluate existing law concerning human trafficking, and make recommendations for legislation, guidelines, and directives to be issued by the Attorney General to address the potential increase in human trafficking related crimes prior to and during the 2026 FIFA World Cup; (2)   review existing assistance programs and analyze whether there is a need to expand current programs or initiate new programs in order to respond to the increased risk of human trafficking crimes prior to and during the 2026 FIFA World Cup; (3)   promote a coordinated response to the increased risk in human trafficking crimes related to the 2026 FIFA World Cup by public and private resources prior to and during the event; and (4)   prior to and during the 2026 FIFA World Cup, develop mechanisms to increase the public awareness of human trafficking, victim remedies and services, and trafficking prevention including the creation of public awareness signs to inform the State that persons may be trafficked into the State and United States. c.     The report shall include, but not be limited to, recommendations on: (1)   best practices the State may take in order to increase awareness of trafficking and ways to identify trafficking victims; (2)   information campaigns that raise awareness of the risk of human trafficking at large events, such as the 2026 FIFA World Cup; (3)   the issuance of public service announcements throughout the State prior to and during the 2026 FIFA World Cup to inform soccer fans that persons may be trafficked into the State and United States prior to and during the event; (4)   the State establishing additional human trafficking hotlines for a period of time prior to and during the 2026 FIFA World Cup; (5)   changes that may be made to State laws related to human trafficking; (6) guidelines and directives to be issued by the Attorney General concerning the identification of and response by law enforcement and prosecuting agencies to the potential increase in human trafficking related crimes prior to and during the 2026 FIFA World Cup; (7)   engaging State and local organizations to aid with assessing risk and adopting necessary mitigation strategies; and (8)   any other issues the Commission deems relevant for the prevention of and response to human trafficking during the 2026 FIFA World Cup. d.    (1) In accordance with section 2 of P.L.2021, c.3 (C.52:17B-237.1), the commission shall develop and determine the language for a public awareness sign related to the 2026 FIFA World Cup that contains the national, 24-hour toll-free hotline telephone service on human trafficking. (2)   Any establishment required to display a public awareness sign pursuant to subsection b. of section 2 of P.L.2021, c.3 (C.52:17B-237.1) shall also, in accordance with that section, display the public awareness sign related to the 2026 FIFA World Cup developed pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection. e.     The Commission shall provide a report to the Governor and Legislature, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), of its findings and recommendations related to the 2026 FIFA World Cup no later than 180 days after the date of enactment of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). f.     The Attorney General shall issue guidelines and directives concerning the identification of and response by law enforcement and prosecuting agencies to the increased risk of human trafficking crimes prior to and during the 2026 FIFA World Cup. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.